North Dakota, session 69, HB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 10-30.5-02 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. Moneys in the development fund may be used to provide financing to early childhood
facilities licensed under chapter 50-11.1. Moneys also may be used to make grants or
loans to match grants or loans made by county-authorized or city-authorized
development corporations, jobeconomic development authorities created under
chapter 11-11.1 or job development authorities created under chapter 40-57.4, and
regional planning councils for acquiring, leasing, or remodeling of real estate facilities
or for acquiring equipment for establishing or expanding a licensed early childhood
facility. In providing financing under this subsection, the corporation shall ensure funds
are distributed fairly among for-profit early childhood facilities, nonprofit early
childhood facilities, and public early childhood facilities. An award under this
subsection may not exceed one million dollars per award.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
11-11.1-01. JobEconomic development authority - Board of directors' members
qualifications.
1. The board of county commissioners, by resolution, may create a joban economic
development authority for the county, or may discontinue a joban economic
development authority which has been created for the county.
a. If the authority is created, the question of discontinuing the authority may be
placed on the ballot at the next regular election by petition filed with the county
auditor at least ninety days before any countywide election and signed by
electors of the county who are residents of the area subject to taxation under
section 11-11.1-04 equal in number to ten percent of the votes cast in the county
in the area subject to taxation under section 11-11.1-04 for the office of governor
in the last general election.
b. The question to be voted on at the election must be submitted by ballot in
substantially the following form:
Should the (insert name of jobeconomic development authority) Yes ☐
be terminated? No ☐
c. Only electors of the county who are residents of the area subject to taxation
under section 11-11.1-04 may vote on the question to discontinue the authority.
The question to discontinue the authority requires a majority of the electors voting
on the question for passage.
2. If the authority is created, a board of directors of not fewer than ten nor more than
twenty members must be appointed by the county commissioners and must consist of
representatives from the following groups, as they may exist:
a. Two members from the county commission.
b. One member from the city council or commission of each city within the county
which has a population of five hundred or more.
c. One member selected from among the city governments of the remaining cities
of the county.
d. If a majority of the townships in the county are organized townships, two
members selected from the township governments of the organized townships in
the county.
Page No. 2 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
e. The remaining members must be selected from a list of candidates from the
following fields:
(1) A representative of the local job service office nearest the county seat.
(2) A member of the local airport authority.
(3) A member of a local institution of higher education.
(4) A member from among the school boards of the county.
(5) A member fromof a local industrial development organization.
(6) A member of the regional planning council serving the county.
(7) A member of the legislative assembly representing a district within the
county.
(8) Members at large from the county.
3. The county commissioners shall make appointments to the board from a slate of
candidates submitted by the chambers of commerce within the county. If no chamber
of commerce exists in the county, the nominations may be submitted by any civic or
patriotic organization within the county. If names submitted are unacceptable, the
county commission may request additional nominees. The members must be
appointed without regard to political affiliation and upon their fitness to serve as
members by reason of character, experience, and training. All members of the board
who do not reside in the area subject to taxation under section 11-11.1-04 are
nonvoting members of the board.
4. The board of county commissioners in a county where an active industrial
development organization exists may enter a contract with the industrial development
organization for performance of the functions of a joban economic development
authority or joint jobeconomic development authority as provided in this chapter and
may use the proceeds of the levy authority under section 11-11.1-04 for that purpose.
5. Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter, if a board of county commissioners
elects to contract with an active economic development organization to perform the
functions of a joban economic development authority:
a. The board of county commissioners, as an alternative to subsections 2 and 3,
may authorize the board of directors of an active economic development
Page No. 3 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
organization to serve as the board of directors for the jobeconomic development
authority authorized under this chapter.
b. The board of directors of the active economic development organization may
elect to seat some or all of the organization's board of directors on the board of
directors of the jobeconomic development authority. The board of directors of the
job economic development authority must be approved by the board of county
commissioners.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11.1-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11.1-01.1. Joint jobeconomic development authority - Board of directors.
The boards of county commissioners of two or more counties, by resolution, may create a
joint jobeconomic development authority for the counties. If the authority is created, boards of
county commissioners shall appoint a board of directors in the size and manner established in
the resolution. The resolution must include provision for discontinuing the authority by the
boards of county commissioners. If the authority is created, the question of discontinuing the
authority may be placed on the ballot at the next regular election by petition signed by electors,
who are residents of the area subject to taxation under section 11-11.1-04, of any county
creating the authority equal in number to ten percent of the votes cast in that county for the
office of governor in the last general election. The question to discontinue the authority requires
a majority of the electors voting on the question in that county for passage. Only electors of the
county who are residents of the area subject to taxation under section 11-11.1-04 may vote on
the question to discontinue the authority. If the question to discontinue in any county creating
the authority is passed, the authority is discontinued.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11.1-02. Members of the jobeconomic development authority board of directors -
Term of office - Oath - Expenses.
1. The members of the jobeconomic development authority board of directors and the
joint jobeconomic development authority board of directors shall serve for a term of
three years or until their successors are duly qualified. Terms of office begin on
January first and must be arranged so that the terms of office of approximately
Page No. 4 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
one-third of the members expire on December thirty-first of each year. Each member
of the board shall qualify by taking the oath provided for civil officers. The oath must
be filed with the county auditor.
2. The board of directors shall annually elect members to serve as chairmanchairperson,
vice chairmanchairperson, secretary, and treasurer. The board shall also shall select
an executive committee with suchthe powers and duties as may be delegated by the
board. The appointing authority shall establish the rate of compensation for the board
members and actual expenses incurred by the members may be reimbursed at the
official reimbursement rates of the appointing authority.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11.1-03. Powers and duties of jobeconomic development authorities.
The jobeconomic development authority or joint jobeconomic development authority shall
use its financial and other resources to encourage and assist in the development of
employment and businesses and promotion of tourism within the county or counties. In fulfilling
this objective, the authority may exercise the following powers:
1. To sue and be sued.
2. To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the
exercise of the powers of the authority.
3. To hire professional personnel skilled in seeking and promoting new or expanded
opportunities within the county or counties.
4. To make, amend, and repeal resolutions consistent with the provisions of this chapter
as necessary to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority.
5. To acquire by gift, trade, or purchase, and to hold, improve, and dispose of property.
6. To certify a tax levy as provided in section 11-11.1-04 and to expend moneys raised by
the tax for the purposes provided in this chapter. A jobAn economic development
authority may accept and expend moneys from any other source.
7. To insure or provide for insurance of any property in which the authority has an
insurable interest.
8. To invest any funds held by the authority.
Page No. 5 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
9. To cooperate with political subdivisions in exercising any of the powers granted by this
section, including enabling agreements permitted under chapter 54-40.
10. To loan, grant, or convey any funds or other property held by the authority for any
purpose necessary or convenient to carry into effect the objective of the authority
established by this chapter.
11. To use existing uncommitted funds held by the authority to guarantee loans or make
other financial commitments to enhance economic development.
12. To take equity positions in, provide loans to, or use other innovative financing
mechanisms to provide capital for new or expanding businesses in this state or for
businesses relocating to this state.
13. To exercise any other powers necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of
this chapter.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11.1-04. Tax levy for jobeconomic development authorities - Financial report.
The board of county commissioners of a county which has a joban economic development
authority or joint jobeconomic development authority shall establish a joban economic
development authority fund and may levy a tax not exceeding the limitations in subsection 14 of
section 57-15-06.7. In the year for which the levy is sought, a joban economic development
authority or joint jobeconomic development authority seeking approval of a property tax levy
under this chapter must file with the county auditor, at a time and in a format prescribed by the
county auditor, a financial report for the preceding calendar year showing the ending balances
of each fund held by the jobeconomic development authority or joint jobeconomic development
authority during that year. The county treasurer shall keep the jobeconomic development
authority fund separate from other money of the county. The county treasurer shall transmit all
funds received pursuant to this section within thirty days to the board of directors of the
authority. The funds when paid to the authority must be deposited in a special account, or
special accounts if the authority chooses to maintain a separate account for promotion of
tourism, in which other revenues of the authority are deposited. Moneys received by the
jobeconomic development authority from any other source must also must be deposited in the
Page No. 6 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
special accounts. The moneys in the special accounts may be expended by the authority as
provided in sections 11-11.1-02 and 11-11.1-03.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subdivision h of subsection 1 of section 40-01.1-04 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
h. Use of other statutory tools relating to social and economic development, land
use, transportation and roads, health, law enforcement, administrative and fiscal
services, recording and registration services, educational services, environmental
quality, water, sewer, solid waste, flood relief, parks and open spaces, hospitals,
public buildings, or other county functions or services, including creation of
cooperative county jobeconomic development authorities pursuant to section
11-11.1-03, multicounty health units pursuant to chapter 23-35, regional planning
and zoning commissions pursuant to section 11-35-01, boards of joint county
park districts pursuant to chapter 11-28 or a combination of boards of park
commissioners with a city pursuant to chapter 40-49.1, or human service zones
pursuant to chapter 50-01.1.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Subsection 14 of section 57-15-06.7 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
14. A county levying a tax for a job development authority as provided in section
11-11.1-04 may levy a tax not exceeding four mills on the taxable valuation of property
within the county. However, if any city within the county is levying a tax for support of a
joban economic development authority and the total of the county and city levies
exceeds four mills, the county tax levy within the city levying under subsection 12 of
section 57-15-10 must be reduced so the total levy in the city does not exceed four
mills.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 57-15-61 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-15-61. Economic growth districts.
In counties that are part of a joint jobeconomic development authority, an economic growth
district may be established by resolution approved by the board of county commissioners of
each county that will be part of the economic growth district. The resolution approved by each
board of county commissioners must specify which of the counties in the economic growth
Page No. 7 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
district will have the responsibility to administer the economic growth increment pool, unless the
boards of county commissioners otherwise agree in writing to different terms and conditions.
1. Upon establishment of an economic growth district, the auditor of each county in the
economic growth district shall compute and certify the taxable value of each lot or
parcel of commercial property, as defined in section 57-02-01, in that county as most
recently assessed and equalized. In each subsequent year, the county auditor of each
county in an economic growth district shall compute and certify the amount by which
the taxable valuation of all commercial lots and parcels of real property in that county,
as most recently assessed and equalized, has increased in comparison with the
original taxable value of all commercial lots and parcels. The amount of increase
determined is the gross commercial growth of that county. If there is a decrease or no
increase in gross commercial growth, the auditor shall certify the gross commercial
growth as zero. The auditor shall compute and certify the net commercial growth of the
county as thirty percent of the gross commercial growth.
2. The county auditor of each county in an economic growth district shall exclude the net
commercial growth determined under subsection 1 from the taxable valuation upon
which the auditor computes the mill rates of taxes levied in that year by the state and
every political subdivision having power to levy taxes on the property. The auditor shall
extend the aggregate mill rate against the net commercial growth as well as the
taxable valuation upon which the aggregate mill rate was determined. The amount of
taxes received from application of the aggregate mill rate against the net commercial
growth is the economic growth increment revenue for that year.
3. The county auditor of each county in an economic growth district shall segregate all
economic growth increment revenue in a special fund.
4. The county treasurer shall remit the economic growth increment revenue to the county
auditor of the county that administers the economic growth increment pool when the
county treasurer distributes collected taxes to the state and to political subdivisions.
5. Before annual certification of county tax levies to the county auditor, the county auditor
in the county that administers the economic growth increment pool shall distribute to
the county auditors of the other counties in the economic growth district the proportion
of the economic growth increment pool which the population of the receiving county
Page No. 8 25.0637.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
bears to the total population of all counties in the economic growth district. Revenue
received by a county under this subsection must be deposited in the county general
fund.
6. An economic growth district may be dissolved by discontinuation of a joint
jobeconomic development authority or by approval of a resolution by the board of
county commissioners of each county in the economic growth district. Upon
dissolution of an economic growth district, any funds remaining in the economic
growth increment pool must be distributed in accordance with subsection 5.
Page No. 9 25.0637.01000